Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-237
Mineral interest; separate listing; application; when.

All applications requesting separate listing of a mineral interest and surface estate must be filed with the county assessor on or before January 1 of the year in which they are to be separately listed and assessed.

Laws 1981, LB 59, § 3.